Wisconsin, session 2025, AB460.
do enact as follows:AB460,1Section 1. 118.60 (2) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:118.60 (2) (ac) Subject to pars. (ag) and (ar) and notwithstanding par. (bm), any pupil in grades kindergarten to 12 who resides in a school district other than a 1st class city school district may attend any private school participating in the program under this section if par. (a) 3. to 9. applies and the pupil’s sibling or a dependent child, as defined in s. 49.19 (1) (a), of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian attended a private school participating in the program under this section or s. 119.23 in the previous school year.AB460,2Section 2. 119.23 (2) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:119.23 (2) (ac) Subject to pars. (ag) and (ar), any pupil in grades kindergarten to 12 who resides within the city may attend any private school participating in the program under this section if par. (a) 3. to 9. applies and the pupil’s sibling or a dependent child, as defined in s. 49.19 (1) (a), of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian attended a private school participating in the program under this section or s. 118.60 in the previous school year.AB460,3Section 3. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to applications to attend a private school participating in a program under s. 118.60 or 119.23 in the 2026-27 school year. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab460 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab460 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB460 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB460 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB460: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting